California statutes. Probate Code
The executor is free of liability and is discharged from any further accountability for distributing assets in compliance with the provisions of this paragraph. 

(3) On any distribution of assets from the estate, the executor shall have the discretion to partition, allot, and distribute the assets in the following manner: 

(A) In kind, including undivided interest in an asset or in any part of it. 

(B) Partly in cash and partly in kind. 

(C) Entirely in cash. 

If a distribution is being made to more than one beneficiary, the executor shall have the discretion to distribute assets among them on a pro rata or non pro rata basis, with the assets valued as of the date of distribution.

(c) Powers of Guardian. A guardian of the person nominated in the California statutory will shall have the same authority with respect to the person of the ward as a parent having legal custody of a child would have. All powers granted to guardians in this paragraph may be exercised without court authorization.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6242.

(a) Except as specifically provided in this chapter, a California statutory will shall include only the texts of the property disposition clauses and the mandatory clauses as they exist on the day the California statutory will is executed.

(b) Sections 6205, 6206, and 6227 apply to every California statutory will, including those executed before January 1, 1985. Section 6211 applies only to California statutory wills executed after July 1, 1991.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 6222, and except as provided in subdivision (b), a California statutory will is governed by the law that applied prior to January 1, 1992, if the California statutory will is executed on a form that (1) was prepared for use under former Sections 56 to 56.14, inclusive, or former Sections 6200 to 6248, inclusive, of the Probate Code, and (2) satisfied the requirements of law that applied prior to January 1, 1992.

(d) A California statutory will does not fail to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) merely because the will is executed on a form that incorporates the mandatory clauses of Section 6241 that refer to former Section 1120.2. If the will incorporates the mandatory clauses with a reference to former Section 1120.2, the trustee has the powers listed in Article 2 (commencing with Section 16220) of Chapter 2 of Part 4 of Division
 9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 279.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

6243.

Except as specifically provided in this chapter, the general law of California applies to a California statutory will.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act [6300. - 6303.]

6300.

(a) A devise, the validity of which is determinable by the law of this state, may be made by a will to the trustee of a trust established or to be established by the testator, by the testator and some other person, or by some other person (including a funded or unfunded life insurance trust, although the settlor has reserved any or all rights of ownership of the insurance contracts) if the trust is identified in the testator’s will and its terms are set forth in a written instrument (other than a will) executed before, concurrently with, or within 60 days after the execution of the testator’s will or in the valid last
 will of a person who has predeceased the testator (regardless of the existence, size, or character of the trust property). The devise is not invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable, or both, or because the trust was amended after the execution of the will or after the death of the testator.

(b) Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise, the property so devised (1) is not deemed to be held under a testamentary trust of the testator but becomes a part of the trust to which it is given and (2) shall be administered and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the instrument or will setting forth the terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto made before or after the death of the testator (regardless of whether made before or after the execution of the testator’s will).

(c) Unless otherwise provided in the will, a revocation or termination of the trust before the death of the testator causes the devise to lapse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   (AB 309)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.

This chapter does not invalidate any devise made by a will executed prior to September 17, 1965.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6303.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Nonprobate Transfer to Trustee Named in Decedent’s Will [6320. - 6330.]

6320.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a)“Designation” means a designation made pursuant to Section 6321.

(b) “Instrument” includes all of the following:

(1)An insurance, annuity, or endowment contract (including any agreement issued or entered into by the insurer in connection therewith, supplemental thereto, or in settlement thereof).

(2)A pension, retirement benefit, death benefit, stock bonus, profit-sharing or employees’ saving plan, employee benefit plan, or contract created or entered into by an employer for the benefit of some or all of his or her employees.

(3)A self-employed retirement plan, or an individual retirement annuity or account, established or held pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) A multiple-party account, as defined in Section 5132.

(5) Any other written instrument of a type described in Section 5000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 31.4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6321.

An instrument may designate as a primary or contingent beneficiary, payee, or owner a trustee named or to be named in the will of the person entitled to designate the beneficiary, payee, or owner. The designation shall be made in accordance with the provisions of the contract or plan or, in the absence of such provisions, in a manner approved by the insurer if an insurance, annuity, or endowment contract is involved, and by the trustee, custodian, or person or entity administering the contract or plan, if any. The designation may be made before or after the execution of the designator’s will and is not required to comply with the formalities for execution of a will.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 31.6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6322.

The designation is ineffective unless the designator’s will contains provisions creating the trust or makes a disposition valid under Section 6300.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6323.

Subject to the provisions of Section 6325, the benefits or rights resulting from the designation are payable or transferable directly to the trustee, without becoming subject to administration, upon or at any time after admission of the designator’s will to probate. A designation pursuant to this chapter does not have the effect of naming a trustee of a separate inter vivos trust but the rights and benefits or the proceeds thereof when paid to the trustee are, or become a part of, the testamentary trust or trusts established pursuant to the designator’s will or shall be added to an inter vivos trust or trusts if the disposition is governed by Section 6300.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6324.

Except as otherwise provided in the designator’s will, the rights and benefits and their proceeds paid or transferred to the trustee are not subject to the debts of the designator to any greater extent than if they were paid or transferred to a named beneficiary, payee, or owner other than the estate of the designator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6325.

(a) The court in which the proceedings are pending for administration of the estate of the decedent has jurisdiction, before or after payment or transfer of benefits and rights or their proceeds to the trustee, to:

(1) Determine the validity of the trust.

(2) Determine the terms of the trust.

(3) Fill vacancies in the office of trustee.

(4) Require a bond of a trustee in its discretion and in such amount as the court may determine for the faithful performance of duties as trustee, subject to
 the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1570) of Chapter 16 of Division 1.1 of the Financial Code and Section 15602 of this code.

(5) Grant additional powers to the trustee, as provided in Section 16201.

(6) Instruct the trustee.

(7) Fix or allow payment of compensation of a trustee as provided in Sections 15680 to 15683, inclusive.

(8) Hear and determine adverse claims to the trust property by the personal representative, surviving spouse, or other third person.

(9) Determine the identity of the trustee and the trustee’s acceptance or rejection of the office and, upon request, furnish evidence of trusteeship to a trustee.

(10) Order postponement of the payment or transfer of the benefits and rights or their proceeds.

(11) Authorize or direct removal of the trust or trust property to another jurisdiction pursuant to the procedure provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17400) of Part 5 of Division 9.

(12) Make any order incident to the foregoing or to the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter.

(b) The personal representative of the designator’s estate, any trustee named in the will or designation or successor to such trustee, or any person interested in the estate or trust may petition the court for an order under this section. Notice of hearing of the petition shall be given in the manner provided in Section 17203, except as the court may otherwise order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 138.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6326.

As to matters not specifically provided in Section 6325, the provisions of Division 9 (commencing with Section 15000) apply to the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6327.

An appeal may be taken from any of the following:

(a) Any order described in Part 3 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 3 made pursuant to this chapter.

(b) An order making or refusing to make a determination specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 6325.

(c) As provided in Section 1304 for an order made pursuant to Section 6326.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6328.

If no qualified trustee makes claim to the benefits or rights or proceeds within one year after the death of the designator, or if satisfactory evidence is furnished within such one-year period showing that no trustee can qualify to receive them, payment or transfer may be made, unless the designator has otherwise provided, by the obligor to the personal representative of the designator or to those thereafter entitled, and the obligor is discharged from liability.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6329.

Enactment of this chapter does not invalidate trusts, otherwise valid, not made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6330.

This chapter, insofar as it is substantially the same as former Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 175) of former Division 1, repealed by Section 18 of Chapter 842 of the Statutes of 1983, shall be construed as a restatement and continuation thereof and not as a new enactment. After December 31, 1984, a reference in a written instrument to the previously existing provisions relating to the subject matter of this chapter shall be deemed to be a reference to the corresponding provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Devise Subject to California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act [6341. - 6349.]

6341.

If a testator’s will provides that devised property shall be paid or delivered or transferred to a custodian subject to the California Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act:

(a) All of the provisions of the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, Part 9 (commencing with Section 3900) of Division 4, including, but not limited to, the definitions and the provisions concerning powers, rights, and immunities contained in that act, are applicable to the devise during the period prior to distribution of the property.

(b) Unless the will clearly requires otherwise, if the person named as the beneficiary for whose benefit the custodial property is to be held attains the age at which the custodianship was to terminate prior to the order of distribution, the devise shall be deemed to be a direct devise to the person named as the beneficiary for whose benefit the custodial property was to be held.

(c) The personal representative of the testator’s estate, upon entry of an order for distribution, shall make distribution pursuant to the order for distribution by transferring the devised property in the form and manner provided by the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

(d) If a vacancy in the custodianship exists prior to full distribution of the devised property by the personal representative, a successor custodian shall be appointed for any undistributed property in the manner provided by the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6345.

The will may provide for successor or substitute custodians and may specify the standard of compensation of the custodian.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6347.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in the will or ordered by a court, each custodian designated in the will and the person for whom the property is to be held shall be deemed a devisee for the purpose of receiving notices which may be required or permitted to be sent to a devisee in the estate of the testator. 

(b) Unless required by the will or ordered by the court, a custodian does not have a duty to participate in the proceedings in the estate on behalf of the minor, and in no event does the custodian have a duty to so participate until the custodian has filed a written notice of acceptance of the office of custodian with the clerk of the court in which administration of the estate of the testator is pending.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6348.

Until distribution of the property pursuant to an order for distribution is completed, the court in which administration of the estate of the testator is pending has exclusive jurisdiction over all proceedings and matters concerning undistributed property, including, but not limited to, the appointment, declination, resignation, removal, bonding, and compensation of, and the delivery or transfer of the undistributed property to, a custodian. After distribution of any property is completed, the court has no further jurisdiction over the distributed property and the property shall be held subject to the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6349.

(a) This chapter shall not be construed as providing an exclusive method for making devises to or for the benefit of minors.

(b) Nothing in this chapter limits any provision of the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, Part 9 (commencing with Section 3900) of Division 4.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Uniform International Wills Act [6380. - 6390.]

6380.

In this chapter:

(a) “International will” means a will executed in conformity with Sections 6381 to 6384, inclusive.

(b) “Authorized person” and “person authorized to act in connection with international wills” means a person who by Section 6388, or by the laws of the United States including members of the diplomatic and consular service of the United States designated by Foreign Service Regulations, is empowered to supervise the execution of international wills.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6381.

(a) A will is valid as regards form, irrespective particularly of the place where it is made, of the location of the assets and of the nationality, domicile, or residence of the testator, if it is made in the form of an international will complying with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) The invalidity of the will as an international will does not affect its formal validity as a will of another kind.

(c) This chapter does not apply to the form of testamentary dispositions made by two or more persons in one
 instrument.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6382.

(a) The will shall be made in writing. It need not be written by the testator himself or herself. It may be written in any language, by hand or by any other means.

(b) The testator shall declare in the presence of two witnesses and of a person authorized to act in connection with international wills that the document is the testator’s will and that the testator knows the contents thereof. The testator need not inform the witnesses, or the authorized person, of the contents of the will.

(c) In the presence of
 the witnesses, and of the authorized person, the testator shall sign the will or, if the testator has previously signed it, shall acknowledge his or her signature.

(d) If the testator is unable to sign, the absence of the testator’s signature does not affect the validity of the international will if the testator indicates the reason for his or her inability to sign and the authorized person makes note thereof on the will. In that case, it is permissible for any other person present, including the authorized person or one of the witnesses, at the direction of the testator, to sign the testator’s name for the testator if the authorized person makes note of this also on the will, but it is not required that any person sign the testator’s name for the testator.

(e) The witnesses and the authorized person shall there and then attest the will by signing in the presence of the
 testator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6383.

(a) The signatures shall be placed at the end of the will. If the will consists of several sheets, each sheet shall be signed by the testator or, if the testator is unable to sign, by the person signing on his or her behalf or, if there is no such person, by the authorized person. In addition, each sheet shall be numbered.

(b) The date of the will shall be the date of its signature by the authorized person. That date shall be noted at the end of the will by the authorized person.

(c) The authorized person
 shall ask the testator whether the testator wishes to make a declaration concerning the safekeeping of the will. If so and at the express request of the testator, the place where the testator intends to have the will kept shall be mentioned in the certificate provided for in Section 6384.

(d) A will executed in compliance with Section 6382 is not invalid merely because it does not comply with this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6384.

The authorized person shall attach to the will a certificate to be signed by the authorized person establishing that the requirements of this chapter for valid execution of an international will have been fulfilled. The authorized person shall keep a copy of the certificate and deliver another to the testator. The certificate shall be substantially in the following form:CERTIFICATE
(Convention of October 26, 1973) 1.I,
 (name, address, and capacity), a person authorized to act in connection with international wills, 2.certify that on (date) at (place) 3.(testator) (name, address, date and place of birth) in my presence and that of the witnesses 4.(a)(name, address, date and place of birth) (b)(name, address, date and place of birth) has declared that the attached document is his will and that he knows the
 contents thereof. 5.I furthermore certify
 that: 6.(a)in my presence and in that of the witnesses (1)the testator has signed the will or has acknowledged his signature 
 previously affixed. (2)following a declaration of the testator stating that he was unable 
 to sign his will for the following reason ________________, I 
 have mentioned this declaration on the will,* 
 and the signature has
 been affixed by (name and address)* 7.(b)the witnesses and I have signed the will; 8.(c)each page of the will has been signed by_________________ and numbered;* 9.(d)I have satisfied myself as to the identity of the testator and of the 
 witnesses as designated
 above;10.(e)the witnesses met the conditions requisite to act as such according 
 to the law under which I am acting;11. (f) the testator has requested me to include the following statement 
 concerning the safekeeping of his will:*12.PLACE OF EXECUTION13.DATE14.SIGNATURE and, ifnecessary, SEAL__________*to be completed if appropriate

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6385.

In the absence of evidence to the contrary, the certificate of the authorized person is conclusive of the formal validity of the instrument as a will under this chapter. The absence or irregularity of a certificate does not affect the formal validity of a will under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6386.

The international will is subject to the ordinary rules of revocation of wills.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6387.

Sections 6380 to 6386, inclusive, derive from Annex to Convention of October 26, 1973, Providing a Uniform Law on the Form of an International Will. In interpreting and applying this chapter, regard shall be had to its international origin and to the need for uniformity in its interpretation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6388.

Individuals who have been admitted to practice law before the courts of this state and who are in good standing as active law practitioners of this state are authorized persons in relation to international wills.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6389.

The Secretary of State shall establish a registry system by which authorized persons may register in a central information center information regarding the execution of international wills, keeping that information in strictest confidence until the death of the maker and then making it available to any person desiring information about any will who presents a death certificate or other satisfactory evidence of the testator’s death to the center. Information that may be received, preserved in confidence until death, and reported as indicated is limited to the name, social security or other individual identifying number established by law, if any, address, date
 and place of birth of the testator, and the intended place of deposit or safekeeping of the instrument pending the death of the maker. The Secretary of State, at the request of the authorized person, may cause the information it receives about execution of any international will to be transmitted to the registry system of another jurisdiction as identified by the testator, if that other system adheres to rules protecting the confidentiality of the information similar to those established in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6390.

After December 31, 1984, a reference in a written instrument, including a will, to the former law (repealed by Chapter 892 of the Statutes of 1984) shall be deemed to be a reference to the corresponding provision of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. INTESTATE SUCCESSION [6400. - 6455.]



  CHAPTER 1. Intestate Succession Generally [6400. - 6414.]

6400.

Any part of the estate of a decedent not effectively disposed of by will passes to the decedent’s heirs as prescribed in this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.

(a) As to community property, the intestate share of the surviving spouse is the one-half of the community property that belongs to the decedent under Section 100.

(b) As to quasi-community property, the intestate share of the surviving spouse is the one-half of the quasi-community property that belongs to the decedent under Section 101.

(c) As to separate property, the intestate share of the surviving spouse is as follows:

(1) The entire intestate estate if the decedent did not leave any surviving issue, parent, brother, sister, or issue of a deceased
 brother or sister.

(2) One-half of the intestate estate in the following cases:

(A) Where the decedent leaves only one child or the issue of one deceased child.

(B) Where the decedent leaves no issue, but leaves a parent or parents or their issue or the issue of either of them.

(3) One-third of the intestate estate in the following cases:

(A) Where the decedent leaves more than one child.

(B) Where the decedent leaves one child and the issue of one or more deceased children.

(C) Where the decedent leaves issue of two or more deceased
 children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 32.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.

Except as provided in Section 6402.5, the part of the intestate estate not passing to the surviving spouse, under Section 6401, or the entire intestate estate if there is no surviving spouse, passes as follows:

(a) To the issue of the decedent, the issue taking equally if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the decedent, but if of unequal degree those of more remote degree take in the manner provided in Section 240.

(b) If there is no surviving issue, to the decedent’s parent or parents equally.

(c) If there is no surviving issue or parent, to the issue of the parents
 or either of them, the issue taking equally if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the decedent, but if of unequal degree those of more remote degree take in the manner provided in Section 240.

(d) If there is no surviving issue, parent or issue of a parent, but the decedent is survived by one or more grandparents or issue of grandparents, to the grandparent or grandparents equally, or to the issue of those grandparents if there is no surviving grandparent, the issue taking equally if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the decedent, but if of unequal degree those of more remote degree take in the manner provided in Section 240.

(e) If there is no surviving issue, parent or issue of a parent, grandparent or issue of a grandparent, but the decedent is survived by the issue of a predeceased spouse, to that issue, the issue taking equally if they are all of the
 same degree of kinship to the predeceased spouse, but if of unequal degree those of more remote degree take in the manner provided in Section 240.

(f) If there is no surviving issue, parent or issue of a parent, grandparent or issue of a grandparent, or issue of a predeceased spouse, but the decedent is survived by next of kin, to the next of kin in equal degree, but where there are two or more collateral kindred in equal degree who claim through different ancestors, those who claim through the nearest ancestor are preferred to those claiming through an ancestor more remote.

(g) If there is no surviving next of kin of the decedent and no surviving issue of a predeceased spouse of the decedent, but the decedent is survived by the parents of a predeceased spouse or the issue of those parents, to the parent or parents equally, or to the issue of those parents if both are deceased,
 the issue taking equally if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the predeceased spouse, but if of unequal degree those of more remote degree take in the manner provided in Section 240.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 32.5.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.5.

(a) For purposes of distributing real property under this section if the decedent had a predeceased spouse who died not more than 15 years before the decedent and there is no surviving spouse or issue of the decedent, the portion of the decedent’s estate attributable to the decedent’s predeceased spouse passes as follows:

(1) If the decedent is survived by issue of the predeceased spouse, to the surviving issue of the predeceased spouse; if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the predeceased spouse they take equally, but if of unequal degree those of more remote degree take in the manner provided in Section 240.

(2) If there is no surviving issue of the predeceased spouse but the decedent is survived by a parent or parents of the predeceased spouse, to the predeceased spouse’s surviving parent or parents equally.

(3) If there is no surviving issue or parent of the predeceased spouse but the decedent is survived by issue of a parent of the predeceased spouse, to the surviving issue of the parents of the predeceased spouse or either of them, the issue taking equally if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the predeceased spouse, but if of unequal degree those of more remote degree take in the manner provided in Section 240.

(4) If the decedent is not survived by issue, parent, or issue of a parent of the predeceased spouse, to the next of kin of the decedent in the manner provided in Section 6402.

(5) If the portion of the decedent’s estate attributable to the decedent’s predeceased spouse would otherwise escheat to the state because there is no kin of the decedent to take under Section 6402, the portion of the decedent’s estate attributable to the predeceased spouse passes to the next of kin of the predeceased spouse who shall take in the same manner as the next of kin of the decedent take under Section 6402.

(b) For purposes of distributing personal property under this section if the decedent had a predeceased spouse who died not more than five years before the decedent, and there is no surviving spouse or issue of the decedent, the portion of the decedent’s estate attributable to the decedent’s predeceased spouse passes as follows:

(1) If the decedent is survived by issue of the predeceased spouse, to the surviving issue of the predeceased spouse; if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the predeceased spouse they take equally, but if of unequal degree those of more remote degree take in the manner provided in Section 240.

(2) If there is no surviving issue of the predeceased spouse but the decedent is survived by a parent or parents of the predeceased spouse, to the predeceased spouse’s surviving parent or parents equally.

(3) If there is no surviving issue or parent of the predeceased spouse but the decedent is survived by issue of a parent of the predeceased spouse, to the surviving issue of the parents of the predeceased spouse or either of them, the issue taking equally if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the predeceased spouse, but if of unequal degree those of more remote degree take in the manner provided in Section 240.

(4) If the decedent is not survived by issue, parent, or issue of a parent of the predeceased spouse, to the next of kin of the decedent in the manner provided in Section 6402.

(5) If the portion of the decedent’s estate attributable to the decedent’s predeceased spouse would otherwise escheat to the state because there is no kin of the decedent to take under Section 6402, the portion of the decedent’s estate attributable to the predeceased spouse passes to the next of kin of the predeceased spouse who shall take in the same manner as the next of kin of the decedent take under Section 6402.

(c) For purposes of disposing of personal property under subdivision (b), the claimant heir bears the burden of proof to show the exact personal property to be disposed of to the heir.

(d) For purposes of providing notice under any provision of this code with respect to an estate that may include personal property subject to distribution under subdivision (b), if the aggregate fair market value of tangible and intangible personal property with a written record of title or ownership in the estate is believed in good faith by the petitioning party to be less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the petitioning party need not give notice to the issue or next of kin of the predeceased spouse. If the personal property is subsequently determined to have an aggregate fair market value in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), notice shall be given to the issue or next of kin of the predeceased spouse as provided by law.

(e) For the purposes of disposing of property pursuant to subdivision (b), “personal property” means that personal property in which there is a written record of title or ownership and the value of which in the aggregate is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the “portion of the decedent’s estate attributable to the decedent’s predeceased spouse” means all of the following property in the decedent’s estate:

(1) One-half of the community property in existence at the time of the death of the predeceased spouse.

(2) One-half of any community property, in existence at the time of death of the predeceased spouse, which was given to the decedent by the predeceased spouse by way of gift, descent, or devise.

(3) That portion of any community property in which the predeceased spouse had any incident of ownership and which vested in the decedent upon the death of the predeceased spouse by right of survivorship.

(4) Any separate property of the predeceased spouse which came to the decedent by gift, descent, or devise of the predeceased spouse or which vested in the decedent upon the death of the predeceased spouse by right of survivorship.

(g) For the purposes of this section, quasi-community property shall be treated the same as community property.

(h) For the purposes of this section:

(1) Relatives of the predeceased spouse conceived before the decedent’s death but born thereafter inherit as if they had been born in the lifetime of the decedent.

(2) A person who is related to the predeceased spouse through two lines of relationship is entitled to only a single share based on the relationship which would entitle the person to the larger share.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

(a) A person who fails to survive the decedent by 120 hours is deemed to have predeceased the decedent for the purpose of intestate succession, and the heirs are determined accordingly. If it cannot be established by clear and convincing evidence that a person who would otherwise be an heir has survived the decedent by 120 hours, it is deemed that the person failed to survive for the required period. The requirement of this section that a person who survives the decedent must survive the decedent by 120 hours does not apply if the application of the 120-hour survival requirement would result in the escheat of property to the state.

(b) This section does not apply to the case where any of the persons upon whose time of death the disposition of property depends died before January 1, 1990, and such case continues to be governed by the law applicable before January 1, 1990.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

Part 4 (commencing with Section 6800) (escheat) applies if there is no taker of the intestate estate under the provisions of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6406.

Except as provided in Section 6451, relatives of the halfblood inherit the same share they would inherit if they were of the whole blood.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 529, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6407.

Relatives of the decedent conceived before the decedent’s death but born thereafter inherit as if they had been born in the lifetime of the decedent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6409.

(a) If a person dies intestate as to all or part of his or her estate, property the decedent gave during lifetime to an heir is treated as an advancement against that heir’s share of the intestate estate only if one of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The decedent declares in a contemporaneous writing that the gift is an advancement against the heir’s share of the estate or that its value is to be deducted from the value of the heir’s share of the estate.

(2) The heir acknowledges in writing that the gift is to be so deducted or is an advancement or that its value is to be deducted from the value of the heir’s share of the estate.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), the property advanced is to be valued as of the time the heir came into possession or enjoyment of the property or as of the time of death of the decedent, whichever occurs first.

(c) If the value of the property advanced is expressed in the contemporaneous writing of the decedent, or in an acknowledgment of the heir made contemporaneously with the advancement, that value is conclusive in the division and distribution of the intestate estate.

(d) If the recipient of the property advanced fails to survive the decedent, the property is not taken into account in computing the intestate share to be received by the recipient’s issue unless the declaration or acknowledgment provides otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 138, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6410.

(a) A debt owed to the decedent is not charged against the intestate share of any person except the debtor.

(b) If the debtor fails to survive the decedent, the debt is not taken into account in computing the intestate share of the debtor’s issue.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6411.

No person is disqualified to take as an heir because that person or a person through whom the person claims is or has been a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 54.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6412.

Except to the extent provided in Section 120, the estates of dower and curtesy are not recognized.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6413.
